en: Canopy type: Draped curtains; Fixed; None; Retractable; Other
es: Tipo de toldo: Cortinas drapeadas; Fijo; Ninguno; Retráctil; Otro
ru: Тип навеса: Драпированные шторы; Стационарный; Нет; Выдвижной; Другое
sk-SK: Typ prístrešku: Riasené závesy; Pevná; Žiadna; Sťahovacia; Iné
da: Type af baldakin: Draperede gardiner; Fast; Ingen; Udtrækkelig; Andet
fr: Type de canopée: Rideaux drapés; Fixe; Aucun; Rétractable; Autre
el: Τύπος στεγάστρου: Ντραπέ κουρτίνες; Σταθερό; Κανένα; Ανασυρόμενο; Άλλο
tr: Gölgelik tipi: Dökümlü perdeler; Sabit; Yok; Açılır kapanır; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul copertinei: Perdele drapate; Fixă; Fără; Retractabil; Altele
sv: Typ av baldakin: Draperade gardiner; Fast; Ingen; Infällbar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de dossel: Cortinas drapeadas; Fixo; Nenhum; Retrátil; Outro
ko: 캐노피 유형: 드레이프 커튼; 고정형; 없음; 개폐형; 기타
nb: Type kanopy: Draperte gardiner; Fast; Ingen; Inntrekkbar; Annet
vi: Loại canopy: Rèm buông; Cố định; Không có; Thu gọn; Khác
cs: Typ stříšky: Splývavé závěsy; Pevná; Žádná; Zatahovací; Jiná
pl: Typ baldachimu: Drapowane zasłony; Stały; Brak; Składany; Inne
it: Tipo di canopy: Tende drappeggiate; Fisso; Nessuno; Retrattile; Altro
th: ประเภทของหลังคา: ผ้าม่านทิ้งตัว; แบบยึดแน่น; ไม่มี; พับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
hu: Napellenző típusa: Felfüggesztett függönyök; Rögzített; Nincs; Visszahúzható; Egyéb
fi: Katostyyppi: Laskeutuvat verhot; Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Sisäänvedettävä; Muu
zh-TW: 遮篷類型: 垂綴窗簾; 固定; 無; 可伸縮; 其他
de: Art des Baldachins: Drapierte Vorhänge; Fest; Keine; Einziehbar; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta nadstreška: Zavese; Fiksno; Brez; Zložljivo; Drugo
zh-CN: 遮阳棚类型: 悬垂窗帘; 固定式; 无; 可伸缩式; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta nadstrešnice: Nabrane zavjese; Fiksno; Nema; Na uvlačenje; Ostalo
ja: Canopyタイプ: ドレープカーテン; 固定式; なし; 格納式; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de tenda para jardim: Cortinas drapeadas; Fixo; Nenhum; Retrátil; Outro
lt-LT: Stoginių tipas: Drapiruotos užuolaidos; Fiksuotas; Nėra; Įtraukiamas; Kita
bg-BG: Вид сенници: Драпирани завеси; Фиксиран; Няма; Прибиращ се; Други
nl: Luifel type: Gedrapeerde gordijnen; Vast; Geen; Intrekbaar; Overig